tr: Akupunktur modeli tipi: Hayvan; Sırt; Kulak; Ayak; Elde yıkama; Kafa; İnsan vücudu; Diğer
hu: Akupunktúrás modell típusa: Állat; Hát; Fül; Láb; Kéz; Fej; Emberi test; Egyéb
pl: Typ modelu akupunktury: Zwierzęcy; Wstecz; Ucho; Stopka; Ręczne; Głowica; Ciało ludzkie; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta akupunkturnega modela: Žival; Hrbet; Uho; Stopalo; Roka; Glava; Človeško telo; Drugo
es: Tipo de modelo de acupuntura: Animal; Espalda; Oreja; Pie; A mano; Cabeza; Cuerpo humano; Otros
ja: 鍼灸模型の種類: 動物; 背中; 耳; 足; 手洗い; 頭; 人体; その他
en: Acupuncture model type: Animal; Back; Ear; Foot; Hand; Head; Human body; Other
vi: Loại mô hình châm cứu: Động vật; Lưng; Tai; Bàn chân; Giặt tay; Đầu; Cơ thể con người; Khác
sk-SK: Typ akupunktúrneho modelu: Zviera; Chrbát; Ucho; Noha; Ruka; Hlava; Ľudské telo; Iné
el: Τύπος μοντέλου βελονισμού: Ζώο; Πλάτη; Αυτί; Πόδι; Χέρι; Κεφάλι; Ανθρώπινο σώμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Akupunktūros modelio tipas: Gyvūnas; Nugara; Ausis; Pėda; Ranka; Galva; Žmogaus kūnas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип на акупунктурния модел: Животно; Гръб; Ухо; Крак; Ръка; Глава; Човешко тяло; Други
th: ประเภทโมเดลการฝังเข็ม: สัตว์; หลัง; หู; เท้า; ซักมือ; ศีรษะ; ร่างกายมนุษย์; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de modèle d’acupuncture: Animal; Dos; Oreille; Pied; À la main; Tête; Corps humain; Autre
nl: Type acupunctuurmodellen: Dier; Rug; Oor; Voet; Hand; Hoofd; Menselijk lichaam; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de modelo de acupuntura: Animal; Costas; Ouvido; Pé; À mão; Cabeça; Corpo humano; Outro
ko: 침술 인체모형 유형: 동물; 등; 귀; 발; 손; 머리; 인체; 기타
ru: Тип модели для акупунктуры: Животное; Спина; Ухо; Ступня; Рука; Голова; Тело человека; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de modelo de acupuntura: Animal; Costas; Orelha; Pé; Mão; Cabeça; Corpo humano; Outro
it: Tipo del modello di agopuntura: Animale; Schiena; Orecchio; Piede; Mano; Testa; Corpo umano; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta modela za akupunkturu: Životinja; Leđa; Uho; Stopalo; Ruka; Glava; Ljudsko tijelo; Ostalo
nb: Type akupunkturmodell: Dyr; Rygg; Øre; Fot; Hånd; Hode; Menneskekropp; Annet
cs: Typ modelu znázorňujícího akupunkturní body: Zvíře; Záda; Ucho; Chodidlo; Ruční; Hlava; Lidské tělo; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip model pentru acupunctură: Animal; Spate; Ureche; Picior; Mână; Cap; Corpul uman; Altele
da: Akupunkturmodeltype: Dyr; Ryg; Øre; Fod; Hånd; Hoved; Menneskekrop; Andet
fi: Akupunktiomallin tyyppi: Eläin; Selkä; Korva; Jalka; Käsinpesu; Pää; Ihmiskeho; Muu
sv: Typ av akupunkturmodell: Djur; Rygg; Öra; Fot; Hand; Huvud; Människokropp; Övrigt
zh-TW: 針灸銅人類型: 動物; 後退; 耳朵; 腳; 手洗; 頭; 人體; 其他
de: Typ des Akupunkturmodells: Tier; Rücken; Ohr; Fuß; Hand; Kopf; Menschlicher Körper; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 针灸模型类型: 动物; 背部; 耳朵; 脚; 手洗; 头; 人体; 其他